Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB919.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 26A.090 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 26A.090 to 26A.115, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Operating costs allowance" means compensation equivalent to the annual expenses
borne by the unit of government for utilities, janitorial service, rent, insurance, and
necessary maintenance, repair, and upkeep of the court facility which do not
increase the permanent value or expected life of the court facility, but keeps the
court facility[it] in efficient operating condition;[, and, at the election of the
Administrative Office of the Courts, capital costs of interior or mechanical
renovations for the benefit of the court.]
(2) "Use allowance" means:
(a) Compensation equal to four percent (4%) annually of the total original capital
costs and the cost of capitalized renovation of the court facility, except that if
indebtedness has been incurred in respect to those[such] capital costs at an
interest rate equal to or greater than seven percent (7%), compensation shall
be at a rate of eight percent (8%) annually of that portion of the capital costs
for which the rate applies;[.]
(b) For refinanced projects constructed or renovated prior to July 1, 1994, the use
allowance payment shall not change for the term of the original bond issue[,]
unless there is a change in the space occupied;[.]
(c) For court facilities renovated or constructed after July 1, 1994, "use
allowance" means the court's proportional share of the annual principal and
interest cost in connection with the renovation or construction, but not to
exceed eight percent (8%) annually of capital costs, or, if there is no debt, four
percent (4%) annually of capital costs; and[.]
(d) Beginning with court facility construction or renovation projects authorized
Page 1 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
by the 2000 Regular Session of the General Assembly, "use allowance" means
the court's proportional share of the annual principal and interest costs in
connection with the construction or renovation of the facility, not to exceed
the authorized annual use allowance;[.]
(3) "Capital costs" means:
(a) The costs borne by the unit of government, excluding grants, conditioned by
the grantor agency specifically for court facility construction or renovation,
for acquisition of property, and for construction and capitalized renovation
including interest accruing during construction or renovation, but no other
interest of each court facility; and[. If capital costs are not documented,
reasonable estimates provided by qualified appraisers will suffice. ]
(b) After July 14, 2000, capital costs, for the purpose of computing the maximum
annual use allowance, shall not exceed the project scope as authorized by the
General Assembly in the judicial branch budget or as increased and approved
under KRS 26A.164;[.]
(4) "Capitalized renovation" means all remodeling involving the structural or
mechanical systems, except for remodeling that involves substantial demolition of
the original structure. Remodeling involving substantial demolition of the original
structure shall constitute construction resulting in a new court facility;[.]
(5) "Unit of government" means a county, city, urban-county government, consolidated
local government, unified local government, charter county, special district, or
corporate entity created for the purpose of constructing or holding title to a court
facility that provides or is authorized to provide a court facility under this
chapter;[.]
(6) "Court facility" means the land and buildings owned or operated by a unit of
government in which space for the Court of Justice is provided. Judges' benches,
jury and witness boxes, and fixed seating shall be considered as permanent building
Page 2 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
fixtures;[.]
(7) "Court Facilities Construction Standards Board[facilities standards committee]"
means the board established under subsection (1) of Section 6 of this Act; and[a
committee consisting of the Chief Justice or his designee; one (1) judge each of the
Court of Appeals, the Circuit Court, and the District Court appointed by the
Supreme Court; the president of the Circuit Clerks' Association; the chairmen of the
House and Senate Judiciary Committees of the General Assembly; the secretary of
the Finance and Administration Cabinet; the director of the Administrative Office
of the Courts; and a county judge/executive appointed by the Governor. Each
appointed member shall serve for a term of four (4) years from the date of his
appointment or until he vacates the office in respect to which he was appointed,
whichever is earlier]
(8) "New project" means any court facility construction or renovation project
authorized by the General Assembly on or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 2. KRS 26A.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Circuit and the District Court shall be held in the county courthouse of each
county unless otherwise ordered by the Supreme Court, in which case it may be
held at any other location made available by the county and owned, leased, or
controlled by the county. Circuit or District Court may also be held in[ such] other
locations in the county as may be convenient and approved by the Supreme Court.
(2) Every county, consolidated local government, or urban-county government shall
provide[ such] reasonably available space which would not disrupt the operation of
county government as necessary in the county courthouse, or in other county
facilities as permitted in subsection (1) of this section, for:
(a) A courtroom or courtrooms for the Circuit and the District Court;
(b) Chambers for the Circuit Judge and District Judge or Judges;
(c) Office space for the Circuit and District Court staffs;
Page 3 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
(d) Office and storage space for the circuit clerk's operations;
(e) Jury facilities for the Circuit and the District Court;
(f) Office space for other officers of the Court of Justice including pretrial release
officers, court reporters, court administrators, judges' secretaries, friends of
the court, and commissioners; and
(g) Any[Such] other facilities necessary for the operation of the Circuit and the
District Court as may be agreed upon by the county, consolidated local
government, or urban-county government and the Administrative Office of
the Courts.
(3) If all necessary facilities for the holding of Circuit or District Court, for the clerk's
operations, or for the operation of the court or its ancillary functions, are not
available in county facilities, every city shall, upon request of the Administrative
Office of the Courts, provide[ such] reasonably available space which would not
disrupt the operation of city government as necessary in the city's facilities for the
operations of Circuit or District Court, or both. The city shall be responsible for
providing space for the operations listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If all necessary facilities for the holding of Circuit or District Court, for the clerk's
operations, or for the operation of the court or its ancillary functions, are not
available in county or city facilities, every agency of state government, special
district, and independent agency of local government[,] other than a city[,] may,
upon the request of the Administrative Office of the Courts, provide[ such] space as
necessary in facilities owned, leased, or controlled by that[such] organization for
the operations of Circuit or District Court, or both. The agency may provide space
for the operations listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If all necessary facilities for the holding of Circuit or District Court, for the clerk's
operations, or for the operation of the court or its ancillary functions, are not
available in public facilities, private facilities may be rented, leased, purchased, or
Page 4 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
otherwise acquired[,] by the Administrative Office of the Courts pursuant to
permission granted by the Chief Justice[ for such acquisition and] in compliance
with[ the provisions of] KRS Chapters 45 and 56, and as authorized by the
General Assembly in the judicial branch budget bill.
(6) For new projects authorized on or after the effective date of this Act, the county
fiscal court or the legislative body of the unit of government, acting as the unit of
government and property owner, shall have full authority and responsibility for
the planning, design, financing, and construction of the court facility in
accordance with the standards established under Section 6 and the requirements
of this chapter.
Section 3. KRS 26A.107 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Administration Office of the Courts shall conduct a[Court Facilities
Standards Committee shall provide for] periodic review of each court facility in
each county and assess the condition, adequacy, and needs of each facility. The
review shall be conducted at least once every four (4) years using uniform
assessment methodology[ and may make recommendations for improvements].
(2) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop and maintain a court
facility assessment county ranking that prioritizes court facility needs statewide
using a consistent scoring methodology. The ranking shall classify the condition
of each county's court facility as critical, high, moderate, or adequate.
(3) (a) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit to the Interim Joint
Committees on Appropriations and Revenue and Judiciary a report on court
facility needs no later than October 1 of each odd-numbered year.
(b) The report shall include:
1. The current court facility assessment county ranking;
2. A recommended prioritized list of counties for new construction or
major renovation, with cost estimates for each recommended project;
Page 5 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
3. A six (6) year capital plan as required by KRS 7A.120; and
4. A summary of the status of all projects currently in progress.
(4) This section shall not be construed to vest in the Administrative Office of the
Courts any authority over the design, construction, contracting, or management
of new projects. The role of the Administrative Office of the Courts under this
section shall be advisory and informational only[
No use allowance shall be paid respecting any capital costs contracted for any court
facility after July 1, 1978, unless the construction or renovation receives prior
concurrence by the Court Facilities Standards Committee].
Section 4. KRS 26A.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each local unit of government that provides a court facility or space for court
operations[Counties, urban-county governments, and cities providing space for
court operations] pursuant to KRS 26A.100 shall also provide at its expense
adequate:
(a)[(1)] Lighting;
(b)[(2)] Heating;
(c)[(3)] Electricity;
(d)[(4)] Other utilities, except telephone service; and
(e)[(5)] Janitorial services;
except as otherwise provided by agreement between the local unit of government
and the Court of Justice[as an adjunct to the providing of space required by that
section].
(2) For new projects authorized on or after the effective date of this Act, the county
fiscal court or the legislative body of the local unit of government and the
Administrative Office of the Courts shall enter into a lease agreement that
specifies the respective obligations of the parties regarding utilities, janitorial
service, maintenance, and related costs. The lease agreement shall be prepared
Page 6 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
and executed by the county attorney on behalf of the county fiscal court or the
local unit of government.
Section 5. KRS 26A.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For court facility projects authorized by the General Assembly prior to the
effective date of this Act, operating costs allowance and use allowance payments
shall continue to be made from the judicial branch budget bill appropriation, and
subsection (3) of this section and Section 12 of this Act shall not alter the
obligations of the parties to those projects[Each unit of government providing
space in a court facility to the Court of Justice under the provisions of KRS
26A.100 shall be paid an operating costs allowance plus a use allowance to be
administered by the Administrative Office of the Courts].
(2) The precise amount paid for operating costs allowance and use allowance permitted
under subsection (1) of this section shall be computed by allocating to the Court of
Justice its proportionate share of each category according to the relative portion of
the floor space in the facility which is occupied by the Court of Justice.
Compensation shall be calculated on an annualized basis, may be in the form of
rental per square footage, and shall be paid quarterly. Should the availability of
space provided to the Court of Justice be limited by the governmental unit to a part-
time basis, the compensation shall be apportioned according to the number of days
or partial days per week in which it is made available, one (1) day or partial day per
week being considered as one-fifth (0.2) of the time.
(3) For new projects authorized on or after the effective date of this Act, the General
Assembly shall provide for funding of debt service and operating costs as
established in Section 12 of this Act[If requested by a unit of government,
operating costs allowance and use allowance payments due in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section shall be due and payable to the unit of government not
less than ten (10) days prior to the interest due date for the bonds, notes, or other
Page 7 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
debt obligations issued to finance the capital costs for court facility space provided
to the Court of Justice by the requesting unit of government].
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 26A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is established the Court Facilities Construction Standards Board with the
following members:
(a) The Chief Justice of the Commonwealth, or his or her designee, who shall
serve as chair;
(b) The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, or his or her
designee;
(c) One (1) District Judge, appointed by the Supreme Court, serving a two (2)
year term;
(d) One (1) Circuit Judge, appointed by the Supreme Court, serving a two (2)
year term;
(e) One circuit clerk, appointed by the Chief Justice from a list of three (3)
names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Circuit Court Clerks,
serving a two (2) year term;
(f) Two (2) county judges/executive appointed by the Governor from a list of
four (4) names submitted by the Kentucky County Judge/Executive
Association, serving staggered terms of two (2) years;
(g) One (1) county attorney, appointed by the Attorney General, serving a two
(2) year term;
(h) One (1) architect licensed under KRS Chapter 323, appointed by the
Governor; and
(i) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or his or her
designee.
(2) The Court Facilities Construction Standards Board shall:
Page 8 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
(a) Establish and periodically update minimum standards for the design,
construction, and renovation of court facilities, including standards
governing:
1. Courtroom size, configuration, and number;
2. Security infrastructure, including separation of judicial officers, court
personnel, and support functions;
3. Accessibility for persons with disabilities;
4. Technology infrastructure;
5. Space requirements for circuit clerk's offices, judges' chambers, jury
rooms, witness rooms, and support functions; and
6. Energy efficiency and building systems;
(b) Review and approve any county or local unit of government request for a
variance from the established standards upon a showing of good cause by
the county fiscal court or the legislative body of the local unit of
government; and
(c) Make the standards and any approved variances available to county fiscal
courts and the legislative bodies of local units of government, and the
General Assembly.
(3) For new projects authorized on or after the effective date of this Act:
(a) The county fiscal court or legislative body of the local unit of government,
as property owner, shall have full authority and responsibility for the
planning, design, financing, and construction of the court facility, in
compliance with the standards established by the Court Facilities
Construction Standards Board under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) 1. The county attorney shall serve as legal counsel for all contracts and
legal matters associated with the new project, including contracts for
architectural and engineering services, construction management,
Page 9 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
general contracting, specialty contracting, financing, and any disputes
arising out of the project.
2. The county attorney may retain outside counsel with the approval of
the fiscal court or the legislative body of the local unit of government.
3. This chapter shall not be interpreted to require review or approval of
the Administrative Office of the Courts or the Court of Justice of any
contract or settlement entered into by the county fiscal court or the
legislative body of the local unit of government in connection with a
new project;
(c) All contracts for design and construction shall be procured in accordance
with applicable law governing public procurement by the applicable county
government or local unit of government;
(d) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide an ex officio,
nonvoting representative to the Local Project Development Board
established under subsection (4) of this section to advise on the operational
needs of the Court of Justice. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall
not have authority to approve, reject, or modify any design, contract, or
procurement decision for a new project; and
(e) The county fiscal court or the legislative body of the local unit of
government shall ensure that the completed facility meets the standards of
the Court Facilities Construction Standards Board before the facility is
accepted by the Court of Justice for use.
(4) (a) For each new project, the county fiscal court or the legislative body of the
local unit of government shall establish a Local Project Development
Board, composed of the following members:
1. The highest elected official of the county government or the local unit
of government, who shall serve as chair;
Page 10 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
2. The most senior Circuit Judge of the Circuit Court in the county
where the facility is located;
3. The most senior District Judge of the District Court in the county
where the facility is located;
4. The circuit clerk of the county;
5. An at-large citizen member who resides in the county where the
facility is located, appointed by the fiscal court or the legislative body
of the local unit of government;
6. The executive director of the Kentucky Bar Association, or his or her
designee; and
7. A representative of the Administrative Office of the Courts appointed
by the Chief Justice, who shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member,
except for purposes of achieving a quorum or breaking a tie vote of
the board.
(b) The Local Project Development Board shall;
1. Oversee project development, including selection of the design
professional, review of project program documents, approval of the
project budget, and coordination with the fiscal court or legislative
body of the local unit of government, and the county attorney on
procurement and construction management; and
2. Report to the county fiscal court or the legislative body of the local
unit of government on the progress of the project.
(5) The Local Project Development Board shall submit the proposed plan for any
project to the Court Facilities Construction Standards Board and shall not begin
work on any project until the plans have been approved by the Court Facilities
Construction Standards Board.
(6) Prior to occupancy of a completed new project, the Court Facilities Construction
Page 11 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
Standards Board shall conduct or commission a review of the facility to confirm
the facility meets the applicable standards. If deficiencies are identified, the fiscal
court or the legislative body of the local unit of government shall have a
reasonable opportunity to cure the deficiencies before occupancy.
(7) As required by KRS 7A.120, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit
a six (6) year capital plan to the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year,
consistent with the requirements of Section 3 of this Act.
(8) This section shall not alter the rights, obligations, or procedures applicable to
court facility projects authorized prior to the effective date of this Act.
Section 7. KRS 26A.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For court facilities projects that are under construction prior to the effective date
of this Act, the Chief Justice shall establish rules of procedure or guidelines on
matters relating to the design[, financing,] and construction of court facilities. The
rules or guidelines shall encompass:
(a) The duties and responsibilities of the Administrative Office of the Courts
under this section;
(b) Criteria for evaluating the feasibility or practicability of various contracting or
construction methods;
(c) A project management system for managing, monitoring, and reporting on
projects through all phases from funding to completion, including change-
order procedures;
(d) Assistance to counties in evaluating proposals for architectural, construction,
or other professional services;
(e) Methods for financing energy savings projects, Americans with Disabilities
Act projects, and other improvement projects;
(f) Kentucky standards for court facilities, including detailed requirements for
space, construction, interior and exterior finishes, structural and mechanical
Page 12 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
systems, fixed and moveable furniture and equipment, and maximum unit cost
for court facilities throughout the Commonwealth; and
(g) The maintenance and operation of court facilities after construction.
(2) For purposes of this section, a court facilities project shall be considered under
construction if ground has been broken on the site of the project. Any court
facilities project that has been authorized by the General Assembly prior to the
effective date of this Act, but is not under construction prior to that date shall be
considered a new project for purposes of control and oversight and shall proceed
under Section 6 of this Act[The Administrative Office of the Courts shall oversee
the design, financing, and construction of court facilities . The Administrative
Office of the Courts shall:
(a) Assess the need for court facilities construction or renovation throughout the
Commonwealth. The assessment shall consider the age, space adequacy,
projected needs, structural soundness, mechanical and electrical systems,
security needs, and interior and exterior quality of existing court facilities;
(b) Develop a project program for the construction or renovation of court
facilities that the Administrative Office of the Courts determines to be most in
need of construction or renovation, based on the needs assessment required
under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The project program shall detail a
complete and specifically defined court facilities project that conforms to the
Kentucky standards for court facilities established under paragraph (f) of
subsection (1) of this section, and shall include itemized space requirements,
space relationships, design goals, scope limits, site considerations, cost
estimates, and a proposed project budget;
(c) Establish the financial condition of any county that contains a court facility
for which a project program under paragraph (b) of this subsection has been
developed to determine the county's ability to participate in the proposed
Page 13 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
project. The Administrative Office of the Courts may discharge this
responsibility by obtaining certification of the county's financial condition
from the Department for Local Government under KRS 147A.021(5);
(d) Develop a prioritized list, with cost estimates, based on land availability and
the considerations required by this section, of proposed court facilities
projects, and submit the list to the Chief Justice for approval and to the Court
Facilities Standards Committee for informational purposes only. Upon
approval by the Chief Justice, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall
submit the prioritized list to the Capital Planning Advisory Board, by April 15
of each odd-numbered year, in accordance with KRS 7A.120; and
(e) Develop and maintain uniform contracts to be used by local units of
government when procuring architectural, construction, financial, or other
services relating to court facilities projects authorized by the General
Assembly.
(3) Before the Administrative Office of the Courts submits a budget request for court
projects under KRS 48.050, each local unit of government that is expected to
participate in financing a requested court project shall enter into a written
memorandum of agreement with the Administrative Office of the Courts. Each
county with a court project authorized by the 2000 General Assembly shall enter
into a written memorandum of agreement with the Administrative Office of the
Courts. The agreement shall be developed by the Administrative Office of the
Courts, shall specify the rights, duties, and obligations of the local unit of
government and the Administrative Office of the Courts relating to the project, and
shall be contingent upon the project's authorization by the General Assembly].
(3)[(4)] A[No] contract or[and no] modification to any contract relating to the design,
financing, or construction of court facilities projects authorized by the General
Assembly that is under construction prior to the effective date of this Act, shall
Page 14 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
not be executed unless first reviewed and approved by the Administrative Office of
the Courts.
(4)[(5)] All court facilities projects subject to this section, beginning with those
authorized by the 2000 General Assembly, shall comply with the Kentucky
standards for court facilities established under paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this
section or as established by the Court Facilities Construction Standards Board.
No other standards shall be used.
(5)[(6)] This section shall not affect or apply to any contract executed prior to July 14,
2000.
(6)[(7)] All local units of government or any other entity providing space to the Court
of Justice under KRS 26A.100 shall, consistent with the law, comply with the rules
of procedure and guidelines established by the Chief Justice and administered by
the Administrative Office of the Courts under this section.
Section 8. KRS 26A.162 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For court facility projects authorized prior to the effective date of this Act, the
following shall apply:
(a) The use allowance in the judicial branch budget recommendation submitted
under KRS 48.100 shall be determined as if bonds will be issued for a term of
twenty (20) years at the prevailing market rate, computed from the estimated
date that the Court of Justice will occupy the facility. If the market rate for the
bonds has increased when the bonds are to be sold, the director of the
Administrative Office of the Courts may approve an extension in the bond
term, up to a total of twenty-five (25) years, but only as necessary to keep the
annual use allowance within the budgeted amount. All bonds issued by any
local unit of government for court facilities projects shall be limited to the
term approved by the Administrative Office of the Courts;[.]
(b)[(2)] Before approving any bond issue for a term exceeding twenty-five (25)
Page 15 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
years, the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit a
proposal for the extended term to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight
Committee. The proposal shall include a statement of the necessity for the
extended bond term and the impact of the extended term on the project's
budgeted scope and authorized annual use allowance; and[.]
(c)[(3)] Within thirty (30) days after receiving a proposal to extend a bond term
beyond twenty-five (25) years, the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations
and Revenue and the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall
either approve or disapprove the proposal and shall then promptly notify the
director of the Administrative Office of the Courts. If either committee
disapproves the proposal, the director of the Administrative Office of the
Courts shall take one (1) of the following actions and shall notify the
committee of its decision in writing within thirty (30) days:
1.[(a)] Disapprove and take no further action on the proposal;
2.[(b)] Revise the proposal to comply with the committee's objections; or
3.[(c)] [Determine to ]Approve and proceed with the proposal over the
committee's objection.
(2) For new projects authorized on or after the effective date of this Act, debt service
shall be funded as provided in Section 12 of this Act, and no use allowance under
this section shall apply.
Section 9. KRS 26A.164 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created a court facility use allowance contingency fund. The fund shall
consist of money appropriated to it in the judicial branch budget by the General
Assembly. Money in the fund shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next
fiscal year or biennium.
(2) The Court of Justice may agree to increase the budgeted scope of a court project or
Page 16 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
project pool authorized in a judicial branch budget bill enacted by the General
Assembly, and may use the use allowance contingency fund to cover any resulting
increase in the budgeted annual use allowance[, if and only] if:
(a) The appropriate unit of government first submits a proposal for the increase to
the Court Facilities Construction Standards Board[Committee], and the Court
Facilities Construction Standards Board[Committee] approves the increase;
(b) The annual use allowance for the project or project pool, adjusted for the
proposed increase in scope, would not exceed the annual use allowance
specified for that project or project pool in the multiyear use allowance
schedule set out in the judicial branch budget bill by more than fifteen percent
(15%); and
(c) The requirements of KRS 26A.166 have been met.
(3) This section shall not apply to any new project, as defined in Section 1 of this Act,
for which funding contingencies shall be addressed through the fiscal court or
the legislative body of the local unit of government as provided in Section 12 of
this Act.
Section 10. KRS 26A.166 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For court facility projects authorized prior to the effective date of this Act, the
following shall apply:
(a) Before the Court of Justice gives final approval to an increase in the budgeted
scope of an authorized project or project pool listed in a judicial branch
budget bill which would result in an increased use allowance, the director of
the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit a proposal for the
increase to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee at least
fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting. The proposal shall include:
1.[(a)] The multiyear use allowance specified in the judicial branch
budget bill;
Page 17 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
2.[(b)] The proposed increase in the use allowance;
3.[(c)] The reasons and necessity for the proposed increase;
4.[(d)] A statement as to whether or how the proposed use of funds
conforms with the requirements of the law; and
5.[(e)] Any other information that the committee requests;[.]
(b)[(2)] Within thirty (30) days after receiving a proposal to increase the use
allowance, the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall either
approve or disapprove the proposal and shall then promptly notify the director
of the Administrative Office of the Courts of its decision;[.]
(c)[(3)] If the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee disapproves the
proposal, the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall take one
(1) of the following actions and shall notify the committee of its decision in
writing within thirty (30) days of receiving the committee's notice of
disapproval:
(a) Revise the proposal to comply with the committee's objections;
(b) Cancel and take no further action on the proposal; or
(c) Determine to implement the proposal over the committee's objection;[.]
(d)[(4)] The Administrative Office of the Courts shall report to the Capital
Projects and Bond Oversight Committee within thirty (30) days of any action
taken by the Court of Justice to approve a scope increase of a project within a
pool which would increase the use allowance for that project; and[.]
(e)[(5)] The Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall maintain
records of proposals, findings, decisions, and actions taken under this section.
When appropriate, the committee shall provide this information to other
legislative committees or to the General Assembly.
(2) For new projects authorized on or after the effective date of this Act, any material
increase in project scope or cost shall be reported to the Capital Projects and
Page 18 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
Bond Oversight Committee by the fiscal court or legislative body of the local unit
of government. When appropriate, the committee shall provide this information
to other legislative committees or to the General Assembly.
Section 11. KRS 26A.168 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For court facility projects authorized prior to the effective date of this Act, the
following shall apply:
(a) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide to the Capital Projects
and Bond Oversight Committee, at the committee's January, April, July, and
October regular meetings, a status report of all incomplete court facilities
projects. The Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall prescribe
data elements for the quarterly status reports. For each project, the status
report shall include:
1.[(a)] The project title;
2.[(b)] The county in which the project is located;
3.[(c)] The scope and use allowance authorized for the project in the
judicial branch budget, and any increases to the scope or use allowance
under KRS 26A.164;
4.[(d)] The current status of the project;
5.[(e)] Estimated completion date of the project;
6.[(f)] An explanation of any delay or major change in the project,
including deletion or modification of project components; and
7.[(g)] Any other information that the committee requests; and[.]
(b)[(2)] On August 1 of each year, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall
prepare a financial report on the court facility use allowance contingency fund
for the fiscal year ending on June 30 of that year. The report shall include,
with explanations, allotments, expenditures, encumbrances, and the available
balance.
Page 19 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
(2) For new projects authorized on or after the effective date of this Act, the county
fiscal court or the legislative body of the local unit of government shall report to
the Administrative Office of the Courts on project status on a quarterly basis, and
the Administrative Office of the Courts shall include a summary of the status of
all new projects in its annual report to the General Assembly.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 26A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For each new court facility project authorized by the General Assembly on or
after the effective date of this Act, the General Assembly shall specify the
authorized project scope and maximum project cost in the judicial branch budget
bill, and shall appropriate funds for debt service and operating costs.
(2) Funds for debt service on bonds issued by or on behalf of the fiscal court or other
legislative body of the local unit of government for the construction of a court
facility shall be appropriated by the General Assembly to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet for disbursement to the county fiscal court or directly to
the bond trustee on a schedule consistent with the county's bond payment
obligations.
(3) For court facility projects authorized prior to the effective date of this Act, use
allowance payments shall continue to be paid from the judicial branch budget bill
appropriation through the Administrative Office of the Courts as provided in
Section 5 of this Act, and this section shall not alter those obligations.
(4) (a) A county fiscal court that receives funds under subsection (1) of this section
shall use those funds exclusively for debt service on bonds and costs
associated with construction issued for the authorized court facility project.
(b) Any funds received in excess of debt service obligations in any fiscal year
shall be held in trust for future debt service payments or returned to the
general fund as directed in the judicial branch budget bill enacted by the
Page 20 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
General Assembly.
(5) The county fiscal court shall report annually to the Administrative Office of the
Courts and to the Finance and Administration Cabinet on the receipt and
application of funds provided under this section.
(6) Operating costs for new projects, including utilities, janitorial services, and
routine maintenance shall be included in the lease agreement between the county
fiscal court or the local unit of government and the Court of Justice pursuant to
Section 4 of this Act, and the General Assembly may appropriate funds for
operating costs to the county fiscal court or the local unit of government directly.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 26A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For new projects authorized on or after the effective date of this Act, the county
fiscal court or the local unit of government, as property owner, shall be
responsible for all maintenance of the court facility, including routine
maintenance, capital maintenance, and major repairs.
(2) The lease agreement entered into under Section 4 of this Act shall specify the
maintenance obligations of the county fiscal court or the local unit of
government and shall include a maintenance schedule and standards consistent
with the standards established by the Court Facilities Construction Standards
Board under Section 6 of this Act.
(3) The General Assembly may appropriate funds for maintenance of new court
facilities to the county fiscal court of the local unit of government directly as
specified in the judicial branch budget bill enacted adopted by the General
Assembly.
(4) The county fiscal court or the local unit of government shall report annually to
the Administrative Office of the Courts on the maintenance activities undertaken
and the condition of the court facility. The Administrative Office of the Courts
Page 21 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1848
shall include a summary of maintenance activities and facility conditions for all
new projects in its annual report to the General Assembly.
Section 14. (1) The provisions of this Act applying to new projects shall
apply to all court facility construction and renovation projects authorized by the General
Assembly on or after the effective date of this Act.
(2) All court facilities projects authorized prior to the effective date of this Act
shall continue to be governed by the law in effect at the time of authorization, and this
Act shall not impair or modify any existing bond covenant, use allowance obligation,
memorandum of understanding, or contract related to those projects.
Section 15. Whereas the provisions of this Act affect capital projects and
budget processes subject to a fiscal year, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 22 of 22
XXXX 3/4/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed